Nebraska, session 109, LB1117.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1117 LB1117
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 80-411, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
80-411 (1) If the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are
met, the University of Nebraska, the state colleges, and the community
colleges shall waive the following for a dependent of a veteran:
(a) All tuition; and
(b) All fees remaining due after subtracting awarded federal
financial aid grants and state scholarships and grants.
(2) A dependent of a veteran person shall be eligible for the waiver
of tuition and such fees if the dependent he or she meets the following
requirements:
(a) The dependent He or she is a resident of this state and meets
the appropriate institution's requirements for establishing residency for
the purpose of paying instate tuition;
(b) The dependent has exhausted all available benefits afforded to
the dependent from the Survivors' and Dependents' Educational Assistance
program offered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
pursuant to 38 U.S.C. 3500, et seq.;
(c) The dependent (b) He or she has a parent, stepparent, or spouse
who was a member of the armed forces of the United States and who:
(i) Died while on active duty;
(ii) Died of a service-connected disability;
(iii) Died subsequent to discharge as a result of injury or illness
sustained while a member of the armed forces which may or may not have
resulted in total disability;
(iv) Is permanently and totally disabled as a result of military
service. Permanent and total disability does not include total ratings or
other temporary ratings except total ratings based on individual
unemployability if permanent; or
(v) While a member of the armed forces of the United States, is
classified as missing in action or as a prisoner of war during armed
-2-

LB1117 LB1117
2026 2026
hostilities; and
(d) (c) If the dependent he or she is a child or stepchild of a
person described in subdivision (2)(c) (2)(b) of this section, the
dependent he or she is under the age of twenty-six years unless the
dependent he or she serves on active duty with the armed forces after his
or her eighteenth birthday but before his or her twenty-sixth birthday,
in which case such period shall end five years after the dependent's his
or her first discharge or release from such duty with the armed forces,
but in no event shall such period be extended beyond the thirty-first
birthday.
(3) An application for a waiver shall be submitted on a form to be
prescribed by the Director of Veterans' Affairs.
(4) If the Director of Veterans' Affairs or the director's designee
determines that the applicant is eligible for the waiver, the director or
the director's designee shall so certify to the institution in which the
applicant desires to enroll. The decision of the director or the
director's designee shall, in the absence of fraud or misrepresentation
on the part of the applicant, be final and shall be binding upon the
applicant and upon the institutions specified in this section. The
director shall adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for
the administration of this section.
(5) The waiver shall be valid for one degree, diploma, or
certificate from a community college and one baccalaureate degree.
Receipt of such degree, diploma, or certificate from a community college
shall precede receipt of such baccalaureate degree.
Sec. 2. (1) Beginning July 1, 2028, subject to available
appropriations, the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
shall reimburse the University of Nebraska, each state college, and each
community college for fifty percent of the tuition waivers provided
pursuant to section 80-411.
(2) The University of Nebraska, each state college, and each
-3-

LB1117 LB1117
2026 2026
community college shall request reimbursement by submitting documentation
in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.
(3) If state appropriations are not sufficient to satisfy all of the
claims filed during any fiscal year, then the commission shall prorate
the reimbursements for the University of Nebraska, each state college,
and each community college for that fiscal year such that the total for
all reimbursements is equal to the appropriation. Any reimbursement
claims paid on a prorated basis shall not be refiled.
Sec. 3. Section 85-2615, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-2615 A first responder or an eligible disabled person may receive
a tuition waiver for up to one hundred twenty credit hours or five years,
whichever comes first, if the first responder or eligible disabled person
he or she otherwise continues to be eligible for participation under
sections 85-2611 to 85-2614.
Sec. 4. Section 85-2616, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-2616 (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, a qualifying child of a first responder who satisfies section
85-2612 or of an eligible disabled person who satisfies section 85-2614
shall be entitled to a tuition waiver as provided in section 85-2620 from
any state university, state college, or community college for an
associate or baccalaureate degree program if the qualifying child:
(a) Meets all admission requirements of the state university, state
college, or community college;
(b) Executes an agreement in accordance with section 85-2617;
(c) Has not previously earned a baccalaureate degree;
(d) Completes and submits to the United States Department of
Education a Free Application for Federal Student Aid;
(e) Submits a document to the state university, state college, or
community college confirming that the qualifying child has satisfied
-4-

LB1117 LB1117
2026 2026
subdivision (1)(d) of this section. Such document shall be submitted in a
form and manner as prescribed by the university, college, or community
college;
(f) Submits the certificate of verification required by subsection
(2) of this section; and
(g) Files with the Department of Revenue documentation showing proof
that, for each year in which the qualifying child applies for and
receives the tuition waiver, the first responder or eligible disabled
person through whom the qualifying child is claiming the tuition waiver:
(i) Is employed as a first responder or is an eligible disabled
person, as applicable; and
(ii) Resides in Nebraska; and .
(h) Maintains a cumulative grade-point average of 3.0 or greater on
a four-point scale while enrolled in the state university, state college,
or community college.
(2)(a) An application for the tuition waiver shall include a
certificate of verification from:
(i) The first responder's superior officer attesting to such first
responder's satisfaction of section 85-2612; or
(ii) The eligible disabled person's former superior officer
attesting to such person's satisfaction of section 85-2614.
(b) The applicant shall include the certificate of verification when
applying to the state university, state college, or community college in
order to obtain a tuition waiver upon initial enrollment.
(3) The death of a first responder in the line of duty that occurs
after submission of an application for a tuition waiver shall not
disqualify such first responder's otherwise eligible qualifying child
from receiving the tuition waiver. In such case:
(a) In lieu of submitting the certificate of verification provided
for in subsection (2) of this section, the qualifying child shall submit
a certificate of verification from the first responder's superior officer
-5-

LB1117 LB1117
2026 2026
attesting that:
(i) At the time of such death, such first responder satisfied
section 85-2612; and
(ii) Such first responder died in the line of duty; and
(b) In lieu of making the filing required by subdivision (1)(g) of
this section, the qualifying child shall file with the Department of
Revenue documentation showing proof that, at the time of such death:
(i) Such first responder was employed as a first responder; and
(ii) Such first responder resided in Nebraska.
(4) For a qualifying child of a first responder who is a
correctional officer or a youth detention officer or of an eligible
disabled person who was a correctional officer or a youth detention
officer, the tuition waiver shall only be available beginning July 1,
2027, and shall only be available for attendance at a state university.
Sec. 5. Section 85-2618, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-2618 A qualifying child may receive the tuition waiver under
section 85-2616 for up to one hundred twenty credit hours or five years,
whichever comes first, if the qualifying child continues to be eligible
for participation. The five years or one hundred twenty credit hours of
tuition waiver eligibility starts once the qualifying child applies for
and receives the tuition waiver for the first time and is available to
such qualifying child for the next consecutive five years.
Sec. 6. Section 85-2620, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-2620 A state university, state college, or community college that
has granted a tuition waiver under the First Responder Recruitment and
Retention Act shall waive XXX one hundred percent of resident tuition
charges remaining due after subtracting awarded federal financial aid
grants and state scholarships and grants for the tuition waiver recipient
during the time the recipient is enrolled. To remain eligible, such
-6-

LB1117 LB1117
2026 2026
recipient must comply with all requirements of the institution for
continued attendance and award of an associate degree or a baccalaureate
degree.
Sec. 7. Section 85-2621, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-2621 (1) Beginning July 1, 2028, subject to available
appropriations, the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
shall reimburse each state university, state college, and community
college for fifty percent of the tuition waivers provided under the First
Responder Recruitment and Retention Act for correctional officers, youth
detention officers, eligible disabled persons that were formerly
correctional officers and youth detention officers, and the qualifying
children of such officers and persons granted in the preceding year by
such state university.
(2) A state university shall request reimbursement by submitting
documentation in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.
(3) If state appropriations are not sufficient to satisfy all of the
claims filed during any fiscal year, then the commission shall prorate
the reimbursements for each state university, state college, and
community college university's total reimbursement for that fiscal year
such that the total for all reimbursements is equal to the in proportion
to the remaining appropriation. Any reimbursement claims paid on a
prorated basis shall not be refiled.
Sec. 8. Original section 80-411, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 85-2615, 85-2616, 85-2618, 85-2620, and 85-2621,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-7-